Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-959
Account of member; credit with regular interest.

The account of each member in the School Retirement Fund shall be credited with regular interest earned monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually as the retirement board may direct.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 33, p. 649;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2933;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 466, p. 851;

Laws 1967, c. 546, § 10, p. 1807;

Laws 1969, c. 735, § 10, p. 2781;

Laws 1974, LB 905, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 19;

Laws 1988, LB 1170, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1532;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 594.